Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-532
Inclusion; county clerk; duties.

The county clerk shall verify the petition as provided in section 32-631 and determine and certify whether or not such petition or joint resolution or ordinance complies with the requirements of section 35-531 and that the persons signing the petition appear to reside within the boundaries described by such petition. Thereafter, the county clerk shall forward such petition, map or plat, and certificate to the board of directors of the district and the village board or city council affected by such inclusion. If the inclusion proposed is by joint resolution or ordinance, the county clerk shall transmit the joint resolution or ordinance and map or plat to the county board for a hearing under section 35-533.

Laws 1978, LB 907, § 3;

Laws 1998, LB 1120, § 22.